test/src/morphology/V-poimw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - pȯimõ: # Verb 41 'eng /est põimida/fin' - full paradigm
     pȯimõ+V+Inf: pȯimõ
     pȯimõ+V+Ger: pȯimõs
     pȯimõ+V+Sup: pȯimõm
     pȯimõ+V+Sup+Ine: pȯimõmõs
     pȯimõ+V+Sup+Ela: pȯimõmõst
     pȯimõ+V+Sup+Tra: pȯimõmõks
     pȯimõ+V+Sup+Abe: pȯimõmõt
     pȯimõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pūoimõb
     pȯimõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pȯimõt
     pȯimõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pȯimõbõd
     pȯimõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pūoimiz
     pȯimõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [pūoimizt, pūoimiztõ]
     pȯimõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [pūoimizt, pūoimiztõ]
     pȯimõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: pȯim
     pȯimõ+V+Cond+Sg3: pȯimõks
     pȯimõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pȯim
     pȯimõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: pȯim
     pȯimõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pȯimõgid
     pȯimõ+V+Jus+Sg3: pȯimõg
     pȯimõ+V+Quo+Sg3: pȯimiji
     pȯimõ+V+ActPrfPrc: pȯimõn
     pȯimõ+V+PssPrfPrc: pȯimdõd
